Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB197.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "certificate of authorization" in section 2 of the act of October 10, 1975 (P.L.383, No.110), known as the Physical Therapy Practice Act, is amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.--The following definitions shall apply, when used in this act, unless otherwise expressed therein:* * *["Certificate of authorization" means a certificate, approved by the board, to practice physical therapy without a referral under section 9(a).]* * *Section 2. Sections 3(a), 7.2 and 9(b), (c) and (e) of the 12345678910111213141516171819 act are amended to read:Section 3. Powers and Duties of Board.--(a) It shall be the duty of the board to pass upon the qualifications of applicants for licensure as physical therapists and certification as physical therapist assistants, to conduct examinations, to issue and renew licenses [and certificates of authorization] to physical therapists and certificates to physical therapist assistants who qualify under this act, and in proper cases to refuse to issue, suspend or revoke the license [or certificate of authorization] of any physical therapist or certificate of any physical therapist assistant. The board may adopt rules and regulations not inconsistent with law as it may deem necessary for the performance of its duties and the proper administration of this law. The board is authorized and empowered to appoint hearing examiners and to conduct investigations and hearings upon charges for discipline of a licensee or certificate holder or for violations of this act and to cause, through the office of the Attorney General, the prosecution and enjoinder of individuals violating this act. The board shall maintain a register listing the name of every living physical therapist licensed to practice in this State, and every physical therapist assistant duly certified pursuant to section 9.1, such individual's last known place of residence, and the date and number of the physical therapist's license and the physical therapist assistant's certificate. Residential information shall not be considered a public record under the act of [June 21, 1957 (P.L.390, No.212), referred to as the Right-to-Know Law] February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.* * *Section 7.2. Continuing Education.--For each license 20250SB0197PN0147 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renewal, a licensee shall complete within the immediately preceding two-year period at least 30 hours of continuing physical therapy education as approved by the board. The licensee shall provide the board with evidence of the completion of the continuing education. [A physical therapist who has met the continuing education requirements for a certificate of authorization set forth in section 9(c)(1) shall be deemed to have met the continuing education requirement for license renewal. No credit shall be given for any course in office management or practice building.]Section 9. Practice of Physical Therapy.--* * *(b) Licensees who meet the standards set forth in this subsection may [apply to the board for a certificate of authorization to] practice physical therapy under this act without the required referral under subsection (a). [A certificate of authorization to] The practice of physical therapy without a referral under subsection (a) shall not authorize a physical therapist either to treat a condition in an individual which is a nonneurologic, nonmuscular or nonskeletal condition or to treat an individual who has an acute cardiac or acute pulmonary condition unless the physical therapist has consulted with the individual's licensed physician, dentist or podiatrist regarding the individual's condition and the physical therapy treatment plan or has referred the individual to a licensed physician, dentist or podiatrist for diagnosis and referral. [The certificate of authorization shall be issued only to licensed physical therapists practicing physical therapy. The certificate of authorization shall be displayed by the certificate holder in a manner conspicuous to the public. The renewal of the certificate of authorization shall coincide with 20250SB0197PN0147 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the renewal of the license of the licensee. Licensees making application for a certificate of authorization] To practice physical therapy under this subsection, a licensee shall present satisfactory evidence to the board of all of the following:(1) That the licensee has[:(i)] passed an examination for licensure to practice physical therapy, which examination included testing on the appropriate evaluative procedures to treat an individual without a referral.[; or(ii) passed an examination for licensure to practice physical therapy prior to 1990 and successfully completed a course approved by the board on the appropriate evaluative procedures to treat an individual without a referral.(2) That the licensee has:(i) practiced physical therapy as a licensed physical therapist in the delivery of patient care in accordance with this act on a continuous basis for at least two years immediately preceding the application for a certificate of authorization;(ii) been licensed under section 6(d.1) and has practiced physical therapy in the delivery of patient care as a licensed physical therapist in a reciprocal state on a continuous basis for at least two years immediately preceding the application for a certificate of authorization; or(iii) provided proof of meeting the standards of clause (i) or (ii) of this paragraph through the application of any combination thereof.](3) That the license of that licensee has been maintained in good standing.(4) That the licensee has professional liability insurance 20250SB0197PN0147 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in accordance with the following provisions:(ii) A licensee shall notify the board within 30 days of the licensee's failure to be covered by the required insurance. Failure to notify the board shall be actionable under section 11 or 12. Further, the [certificate of authorization] license of that licensee shall automatically be suspended upon failure to be covered by the required insurance and shall not be restored until submission to the board of satisfactory evidence that the licensee has the required professional liability insurance coverage.(iii) The board shall accept from licensees as satisfactory evidence of insurance coverage under this subsection any or all of the following: self-insurance, personally purchased professional liability insurance, professional liability insurance coverage provided by the licensee's employer or any similar type of coverage.(iii.1) A licensee under this act, practicing in this Commonwealth, shall maintain a level of professional liability insurance coverage in the minimum amount of $1,000,000 per occurrence or claims made. Failure to maintain insurance coverage as required shall subject the licensee to disciplinary proceedings. The board shall accept as satisfactory evidence of insurance coverage any of the following:(A) self-insurance;(B) personally purchased liability insurance; or(C) professional liability insurance coverage provided by the physical therapist's employer or similar insurance coverage acceptable to the board.(iii.2) A license applicant shall provide proof that the applicant has obtained professional liability insurance in 20250SB0197PN0147 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with subparagraph (iii.1). It is sufficient if the applicant files with the application a copy of a letter from the applicant's professional liability insurance carrier indicating that the applicant will be covered against professional liability in the required amounts effective upon the issuance of the applicant's license to practice physical therapy in this Commonwealth.(iii.3) Upon issuance of a license, a licensee has 30 days to submit to the board the certificate of insurance or a copy of the policy declaration page.(iv) The board shall adopt, by regulation, standards and procedures established by the Insurance Commissioner for self-insurance. In the absence of these standards and procedures, the board, after consultation with the Insurance Commissioner, shall establish standards and procedures by regulation for self-insurance under this subsection.[(c) (1) For each renewal of the certificate of authorization, the licensee shall complete within the immediately preceding two-year period at least 30 hours of continuing physical therapy education related to keeping the certificate holder apprised of advancements and new developments in the practice of the physical therapy profession. At least ten of the 30 hours shall be in appropriate evaluative procedures to treat an individual without a referral. No credit shall be given for any course in office management or practice building. The licensee shall provide the board with evidence of the completion of the continuing education.(2) Continuing education programs and program providers under this subsection shall be approved by the board in accordance with standards and criteria established by the board 20250SB0197PN0147 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by regulation. The regulation shall include any fees necessary to implement this provision and provide for waiver of the continuing education requirement due to illness or hardship in any licensing renewal period.]* * *(e) A physical therapist may treat an individual without a referral as provided for in subsection (b) for up to [30] 60 days from the date of the first treatment. A physical therapist shall not treat an individual beyond [30] 60 days from the date of the first treatment unless he or she has obtained a referral from a licensed physician; a licensed physician assistant practicing pursuant to a written agreement with a physician; a certified registered nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to a collaborative agreement with a physician; or a licensed dentist or licensed podiatrist, for the treatment of a condition that is within the scope of practice of dentistry or podiatry. The date of the first treatment for purposes of this subsection is the date the individual is treated by any physical therapist treating without a referral.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0197PN0147 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021